src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-norm.yaml
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsiminiidiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsiminiidigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+4: owaaboozoonsimiwaabaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonsimiwaabaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonsimiwaabaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonsimiwaadigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsimiwaadiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsimiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonyishinaanibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonyishinaanibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonyishinaanibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonyishinaanidigan
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonyishinaanidiging
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonyishinaanidigag
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonsishinaanibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonsishinaanibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonsishinaanibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonsishinaanidigan
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonsishinaanidiging
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonsishinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonyishinaanibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonyishinaanibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonyishinaanibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyishinaanidigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyishinaanidiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyishinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonyishiwaabaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonyishiwaabaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonyishiwaabaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyishiwaadigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyishiwaadiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyishiwaadigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonsishinaanibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonsishinaanibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonsishinaanibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsishinaanidigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsishinaanidiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsishinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonsishiwaabaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonsishiwaabaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonsishiwaabaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsishiwaadigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsishiwaadiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsishiwaadigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: owaaboozoonyishiniibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonyishiniibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonyishiniibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonyishiniidigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonyishiniidiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonyishiniidigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: owaaboozoonyishiwaabaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonyishiwaabaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonyishiwaabaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonyishiwaadigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonyishiwaadiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonyishiwaadigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: owaaboozoonsishiniibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonsishiniibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonsishiniibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonsishiniidigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsishiniidiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsishiniidigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: owaaboozoonsishiwaabaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonsishiwaabaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonsishiwaabaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonsishiwaadigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsishiwaadiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsishiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: niwaaboozomishinaanibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozomishinaanibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozomishinaanibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: niwaaboozomishinaanidigan
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozomishinaanidiging
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozomishinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozomishinaanibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozomishinaanibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozomishinaanibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozomishinaanidigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozomishinaanidiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozomishinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozomishiwaabaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozomishiwaabaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozomishiwaabaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozomishiwaadigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozomishiwaadiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozomishiwaadigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: owaaboozomishiniibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: owaaboozomishiniibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: owaaboozomishiniibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozomishiniidigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozomishiniidiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozomishiniidigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: owaaboozomishiwaabaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: owaaboozomishiwaabaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: owaaboozomishiwaabaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozomishiwaadigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozomishiwaadiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozomishiwaadigag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonyimishinaanibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonyimishinaanibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonyimishinaanibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonyimishinaanidigan
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonyimishinaanidiging
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonyimishinaanidigag
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonsimishinaanibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonsimishinaanibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonsimishinaanibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonsimishinaanidigan
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonsimishinaanidiging
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonsimishinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonyimishinaanibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonyimishinaanibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimishinaanibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyimishinaanidigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyimishinaanidiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimishinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonyimishiwaabaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonyimishiwaabaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimishiwaabaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyimishiwaadigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyimishiwaadiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimishiwaadigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonsimishinaanibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonsimishinaanibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimishinaanibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsimishinaanidigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsimishinaanidiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimishinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonsimishiwaabaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonsimishiwaabaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimishiwaabaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsimishiwaadigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsimishiwaadiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimishiwaadigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: owaaboozoonyimishiniibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonyimishiniibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonyimishiniibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonyimishiniidigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonyimishiniidiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonyimishiniidigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: owaaboozoonyimishiwaabaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonyimishiwaabaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonyimishiwaabaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonyimishiwaadigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonyimishiwaadiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonyimishiwaadigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: owaaboozoonsimishiniibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonsimishiniibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonsimishiniibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonsimishiniidigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsimishiniidiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsimishiniidigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: owaaboozoonsimishiwaabaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonsimishiwaabaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonsimishiwaabaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonsimishiwaadigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsimishiwaadiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsimishiwaadigag
     
